Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-973
Water service district; assessments; lien; date due; payable.

All assessments made under the provisions of sections 17-970 to 17-976 shall be a lien on the property against which levied from the date of levy and shall thereupon be certified by direction of the governing body to the treasurer of such city or village for collection. Except as provided in section 18-1216, such assessments shall be due and payable to such treasurer until November 1 thereafter or until the delivery of the tax list for such year to the treasurer of the county in which such city or village may be situated, at and after which time the same shall be due and payable to such county treasurer. The governing body of such city or village shall, within the time provided by law, cause such assessments, or the portion thereof remaining unpaid, to be certified to the county clerk of the county for entry upon the proper tax lists. If the city or village treasurer collects any assessment or portion thereof so certified while the same shall be payable to the county treasurer, the city or village treasurer shall certify the assessment or portion thereof to the county treasurer at once, and the county treasurer shall correct the record to show such payment.

Laws 1967, c. 73, § 4, p. 238;

Laws 1996, LB 962, § 2.